lexd/glob.lexd
#############################
# Global separators pattern #
#############################

PATTERN _morph_
[>:>]

PATTERN _hyphen_
[:-]?

PATTERN _morph_hyphen_
_morph_ _hyphen_

PATTERN _hyphen_morph_
_hyphen_ _morph_

##########################################
# Adverbal suffix (nouns and adjectives) #
##########################################
LEXICON Adv
<adv>:{Й}аθ
